pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SFX X Y 135
SFX X   ar              o/PL                    [^-]ar
SFX X   r               s/PL                    ar
SFX X   ar              a/PL                    [^-]ar
SFX X   r               mos/PL                  ar
SFX X   r               is/PL                   ar
SFX X   r               m/PL                    ar
SFX X   ar              e/PL                    [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             que/PL                  car
SFX X   gar             gue/PL                  gar
SFX X   çar             ce/PL                   çar
SFX X   ar              es/PL                   [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             ques/PL                 car
SFX X   gar             gues/PL                 gar
SFX X   çar             ces/PL                  çar
SFX X   ar              emos/PL                 [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             quemos/PL               car
SFX X   gar             guemos/PL               gar
SFX X   çar             cemos/PL                çar
SFX X   ar              eis/PL                  [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             queis/PL                car
SFX X   gar             gueis/PL                gar
SFX X   çar             ceis/PL                 çar
SFX X   ar              em/PL                   [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             quem/PL                 car
SFX X   gar             guem/PL                 gar
SFX X   çar             cem/PL                  çar
SFX X   ar              a/PL                    [^-]ar
SFX X   ar              e/PL                    [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             que/PL                  car
SFX X   gar             gue/PL                  gar
SFX X   çar             ce/PL                   çar
SFX X   ar              emos/PL                 [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             quemos/PL               car
SFX X   gar             guemos/PL               gar
SFX X   çar             cemos/PL                çar
SFX X   r               i/PL                    ar
SFX X   ar              em/PL                   [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car             quem/PL                 car
SFX X   gar             guem/PL                 gar
SFX X   çar             cem/PL                  çar
SFX X   er              o/PL                    [^cug-]er
SFX X   cer             ço/PL                   cer
SFX X   ger             jo/PL                   ger
SFX X   guer            go/PL                   guer
SFX X   r               s/PL                    er
SFX X   er              e/PL                    er
SFX X   r               mos/PL                  er
SFX X   r               is/PL                   er
SFX X   r               m/PL                    er
SFX X   er              a/PL                    [^cug-]er
SFX X   cer             ça/PL                   cer
SFX X   ger             ja/PL                   ger
SFX X   guer            ga/PL                   guer
SFX X   er              as/PL                   [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             ças/PL                  cer
SFX X   ger             jas/PL                  ger
SFX X   guer            gas/PL                  guer
SFX X   er              amos/PL                 [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             çamos/PL                cer
SFX X   ger             jamos/PL                ger
SFX X   guer            gamos/PL                guer
SFX X   er              ais/PL                  [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             çais/PL                 cer
SFX X   ger             jais/PL                 ger
SFX X   guer            gais/PL                 guer
SFX X   er              am/PL                   [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             çam/PL                  cer
SFX X   ger             jam/PL                  ger
SFX X   guer            gam/PL                  guer
SFX X   er              e/PL                    er
SFX X   er              a/PL                    [^cug^-]er
SFX X   cer             ça/PL                   cer
SFX X   ger             ja/PL                   ger
SFX X   guer            ga/PL                   guer
SFX X   er              amos/PL                 [^cu]er
SFX X   cer             çamos/PL                cer
SFX X   ger             jamos/PL                ger
SFX X   guer            gamos/PL                guer
SFX X   r               i/PL                    er
SFX X   er              am/PL                   [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             çam/PL                  cer
SFX X   ger             jam/PL                  ger
SFX X   guer            gam/PL                  guer
SFX X   ir              o/PL                    [^cug-]ir
SFX X   cir             ço/PL                   cir
SFX X   gir             jo/PL                   gir
SFX X   quir            co/PL                   quir
SFX X   uir             o/PL                    guir
SFX X   ir              es/PL                   ir
SFX X   ir              e/PL                    ir
SFX X   r               mos/PL                  ir
SFX X   r               s/PL                    ir
SFX X   ir              em/PL                   ir
SFX X   ir              a/PL                    [^cug-]ir
SFX X   cir             ça/PL                   cir
SFX X   gir             ja/PL                   gir
SFX X   quir            ca/PL                   quir
SFX X   uir             a/PL                    guir
SFX X   ir              as/PL                   [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             ças/PL                  cir
SFX X   gir             jas/PL                  gir
SFX X   quir            cas/PL                  quir
SFX X   uir             as/PL                   guir
SFX X   ir              amos/PL                 [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             çamos/PL                cir
SFX X   gir             jamos/PL                gir
SFX X   quir            camos/PL                quir
SFX X   uir             amos/PL                 guir
SFX X   ir              ais/PL                  [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             çais/PL                 cir
SFX X   gir             jais/PL                 gir
SFX X   quir            cais/PL                 quir
SFX X   uir             ais/PL                  guir
SFX X   ir              am/PL                   [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             çam/PL                  cir
SFX X   gir             jam/PL                  gir
SFX X   quir            cam/PL                  quir
SFX X   uir             am/PL                   guir
SFX X   ir              e/PL                    ir
SFX X   ir              a/PL                    [^cug-]ir
SFX X   cir             ça/PL                   cir
SFX X   gir             ja/PL                   gir
SFX X   quir            ca/PL                   quir
SFX X   uir             a/PL                    guir
SFX X   ir              amos/PL                 [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             çamos/PL                cir
SFX X   gir             jamos/PL                gir
SFX X   quir            camos/PL                quir
SFX X   uir             amos/PL                 guir
SFX X   ir              i/PL                    ir
SFX X   ir              am/PL                   [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             çam/PL                  cir
SFX X   gir             jam/PL                  gir
SFX X   quir            cam/PL                  quir
SFX X   uir             am/PL                   guir
