pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.dic
abandonar/XYPLMNWvé
abençoar/XYPLD
abnegar/XYPLBcD
aborrecer/XYPLDMBNv
abreviar/XYPLDMNWBc
absorver/XYPLDnvR
acalorar/XYPLNWB
acariocar/XYPL
acelerar/XYPLDMBNWcnRS
acetinar/XYPLDcg
acinzar/XYPLM
aclimatizar/XYPL
acometer/XYPLMDv
acoplar/XYPLMDcvgRS
acovardar/XYPLM
aculturar/XYPLDMcnS
adensar/XYPLDM
aditivar/XYPLc
admoestar/XYPLcD
adornar/XYPL
advogar/XYPL
aferrar/XYPL
afocinhar/XYPL
agenciar/XYPLDM
agrisalhar/XYPL
alarmar/XYPLNn
alesmar/XYPL
alinhar/XYPLDMNWRS
alternar/XYPLDBcnv
amamentar/XYPLDcn
ameninar/XYL
amontoar/XYPLScMD
anacronizar/XYPL
aniquilar/XYPLcMD
anualizar/XYPL
apartar/XYPLcD
apetitar/XYPL
apoquentar/XYPLcD
apresentar/XYPLcnvRé
aquecer/XYPLMDvRS
ariscar/XYPL
arrebatar/XYPLMDnB
arrendar/XYPLcMDvu
arruaçar/XYL
assar/XYPLDNWé
assoar/XYPL
atapetar/XYPL
ater/XYPL
atraiçoar/XYPLD
aturar/XYPLDv
automobilizar/XYPL
avermelhar/XYPLM
avocar/XYPLc
bagunçar/XYPLNW
banzar/XYPL
beberricar/XYPL
bicar/XYPL
bocejar/XYLDn
bostejar/XYPLD!
brotar/XYPLDMcRé
cacifar/XYPL
calcular/XYPLDBNWvRí
cantarejar/XYPL
carbonatar/XYPLc
carregar/XYPLDMNWcvERSU
catimbar/XYPLN
celebrar/XYPLDNcnv
chamar/XYPLDMéR
chispar/XY
cilindrar/XYPL
circunvagar/XYPLn
clinicar/XYPL
coar/XYPLDcé
coexecutar/XYPL
coligar/XYPLc
comer/XYPLDcví
compartimentalizar/XYPLc
compulsar/XYPLcDv
conclamar/XYPLc
confeitar/XY
congelar/XYPLDMNWcvRSí
consensualizar/XYPLnc
constranger/XYPLDBMN
contingenciar/XYPLMcS
contraplacar/XYPL
convergir/XYLPn
copatrocinar/XYPLD
corrigir/XYPLvRé
credenciar/XYPLMS
cromatizar/XYPL
currar/XYPLDM
debitar/XYPL
declivar/XYPL
defasar/XYPLMNWg
degolar/XYPLDMc
delirar/XYLP
denunciar/XYPLDcnvU
deputar/XYPL
desancar/XYPLD
descartar/XYPLv
desenhar/XYPLNWER
desgraçar/XYPLBNWjk
desmiolar/XYPL
despenhar/XYPLM
destacar/XYPLMBví
desvendar/XYPLDMví
devastar/XYPLcDn
digitar/XYPLDNWcvR
discar/XYPLDgR
disputar/XYPLDBNnvRé
disturbar/XYPL
domar/XYPLDcví
dualizar/XYPLD
efemerizar/XYPL
elidir/XYPL
embalsar/XYPLM
embasbacar/XYPLcMnB
embolizar/XYPLc
embrumar/XYPL
empacar/XYPLS
empastelar/XYPLDMnS
empirulitar/XYPL
empresariar/XYPL
encabular/XYPLDcS
encapar/XYPLMS
encarregar/XYPLS
encerrar/XYPLMSé
encordoar/XYPLDM
encurralar/XYPLSM
enfadar/XYPLM
enfivelar/XYPLM
engaiolar/XYPLMS
engolfar/XYPL
enjoar/XYPLMNWS
enrabar/XYPLM
enrubescer/XYPLM
ensinar/XYPLDMvRS
entocar/XYPLS
entreolhar/XYPL
enublar/XYPLc
envidraçar/XYPLM
equidistar/XYPLn
esbanjar/XYPLMD
escamar/XYPLc
escolher/XYPLMé
escrotizar/XYPLcn!
esfolar/XYPLMD
esgrimir/XYPLD
espalhar/XYPLDMv
espetacularizar/XYPLc
esponjar/XYPL
esquiar/XYPLD
estandardizar/XYPLc
estirar/XYPLDM
estreitar/XYPLMD
estupeficar/XYPLn
evadir/XYPL
excepcionar/XYPL
exigir/XYPLvn
explanar/XYPLDc
exteriorizar/XYPLc
exumar/XYPLDc
faltar/XYLPnv
faturar/XYPLDMcRu
fetichizar/XYPLc
fintar/XYPL
flechar/XYPL
foder/XYPLDBNWv!
fortificar/XYPLDcnR
fraturar/XYPLMc
funcionar/XYLMn
galgar/XYPLc
gaseificar/XYPLcD
gestar/XYPLcn
gostar/XYPLvS
gratificar/XYPLDcnU
guiar/XYPLMDví
heroicizar/XYPL
historiar/XYPLD
idiotizar/XYPLcn
imitir/XYPL
imprecar/XYPLDc
inaugurar/XYPLDcRé
incubar/XYPLcD
indulgenciar/XYPL
inflamar/XYPLDcnvS
inquinar/XYPLcM
institucionalizar/XYPLc
interceder/XYLn
interpretar/XYPLDcnvRU
intumescer/XYPL
irrigar/XYPLcDvn
judicializar/XYPLcS
lacrar/XYPLDNWcnS
lanchar/XYPLS
legar/XYPLc
liberar/XYPLDNWc
livrar/XYPLcMD
luxar/XYPLcu
maldiçoar/XYPL
manejar/XYPLDvRM
maravilhar/XYPLM
mastigar/XYPLDcvW
medrar/XYPL
mentalizar/XYPLc
metralhar/XYPLD
mimetizar/XYPLDcn
mistificar/XYPLcDS
moldurar/XYPL
morgar/XYPL
murar/XYPLM
naufragar/XYLnv
nodular/XYL
nunciar/XYPLcn
obsidiar/XYPL
oferecer/XYPLMD
opiar/XYPL
orientalizar/XYPL
ovacionar/XYPL
palpitar/XYPLcn
parcelar/XYPLMBNWvR
pasteurizar/XYPLcD
peidar/XYPL!
perambular/XYLPc
perfundir/XYPL
perpassar/XYPLv
peticionar/XYLPMn
pingar/XYPLW
planejar/XYPLDBMNWR
polinizar/XYPLDcé
positivar/XYPLc
preceder/XYPL
prefixar/XYPLcS
preocupar/XYPLDcnNWBS
prestigiar/XYPLDMNWcnS
procriar/XYPLcD
prometer/XYPLMN
prosar/XYLD
prurir/XYL
purificar/XYPLDcnI
quesitar/XYPLc
radiografar/XYPL
rapinar/XYPLcDn
reavistar/XYL
receber/XYPLDMNWvé
recrudescer/XYLMn
reflorir/XYL
regenerar/XYPLDcnvUí
reivindicar/XYPLDcn
remedar/XYPL
rentabilizar/XYPLnc
reprimir/XYPLDNWví
resguardar/XYPL
ressarcir/XYPLM
retificar/XYPLcDv
revidar/XYPL
ritualizar/XYPLnc
rosnar/XYPLD
sabatinar/XYPL
salivar/pXYLDcn
satanizar/XYPLc
segmentar/XYPLcDv
separar/XYPLDBcvNWé
sextuplicar/XYPLc
sinfonizar/XYPL
sobrealimentar/XYPLc
sobretaxar/XYPLc
solavancar/XYL
sonhar/XYPLD
submeter/XYPLM
subverter/XYPLMD
sumular/XYPLp
superlativar/XYPLc
surtir/XYPLR
talhar/XYPLMDn
teatralizar/XYPLc
tencionar/XYPL
texturizar/XYPLDcR
tolerar/XYPLDB
torturar/XYPLn
tramitar/XYPLc
transicionar/XYPLDSé
transportar/XYPLDMcví
tremular/XYPLcn
tripudiar/XYPL
trumbicar/XYPL
ulcerar/XYPLcv
urinar/XYPLDc
vampirizar/XYPL
vencer/XYPLMNWvé
verter/XYPLDn
vincar/XYPLB
vitalizar/XYPLDcnRS
volatizar/XYPLc
xingar/XYPLcMD
